Louisiana, session 2026, HB164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:716 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§716. Commissioner; duties; powers; contempt
A. The commissioner of the Fifteenth Judicial District Court shall perform
such duties as are assigned by the chief judge of the district in accordance with rules
which shall be prescribed by the elected judges of the court, not inconsistent
herewith or with the constitution and laws of the state.
B.(1) The commissioner shall have all powers of a district judge not
inconsistent with the constitution and laws of the state of Louisiana and the United
States, including but not limited to the power to administer oaths and affirmations,
take acknowledgments, affidavits, and depositions, sign orders, act in felony and
misdemeanor charges, hear preliminary motions, accept pleas in misdemeanor cases
including misdemeanor cases preliminary to trial on the merits, conduct trials of
misdemeanor cases, fix bail, and sign and issue search and arrest warrants upon
probable cause being shown and in accordance with Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) In felony cases, the commissioner shall not try and adjudicate
preliminary hearings, motions for discovery, motions to suppress, motions to quash,
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 164 ENROLLED
and trials on the merits. The commissioner may be designated and assigned to hear
and determine any felony pretrial matter pending before the court, not inconsistent
with the provisions of this Paragraph. The commissioner shall not adjudicate felony
cases.
(3) In misdemeanor cases, the commissioner may be designated to hear,
determine, and adjudicate any matter pending before the court.
(4) In civil cases, the commissioner may be designated and assigned to
conduct hearings, including evidentiary hearings, and trials, except motions for
injunctive relief and temporary restraining orders. In furtherance of the above, civil
trials and hearings by the commissioner shall be governed by the following rules:
(a) The commissioner may conduct any or all proceedings on any matter
pending before the court and order the entry of judgment in any case where the
parties consent to the matter being heard and adjudicated by the commissioner. Each
judgment so entered shall be signed by a judge of the district. The clerk of court, at
the time the action is filed, shall notify the parties of their right to consent to the
exercise of such jurisdiction. The decision of the parties shall be communicated to
the clerk. An aggrieved party may appeal a judgment of the commissioner rendered
pursuant to the authority of this Subsection in the same manner as an appeal from
any other judgment of a district court.
(b) If any party does not consent to the matter being heard and adjudicated
by the commissioner, then the commissioner may be designated to conduct the trials
and hearings and to submit to the judge of the appropriate division, proposed
findings of fact and recommendations for the disposition thereof of any matter or
motion pending before the court or any application for post trial relief made therein.
In such cases, the commissioner shall file his proposed findings and
recommendations with the court, and a copy shall forthwith be mailed, postage
prepaid, to all parties or their counsel of record. Within ten days after transmittal of
such copy, any party may traverse such findings or recommendations in writing in
such manner as shall be specified by the rules of the district court. The judge of the
appropriate division shall make a de novo determination of any findings or
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 164 ENROLLED
recommendations to which objection is made. The judge may accept, reject, or
modify in whole or in part the findings or recommendations made by the
commissioner and also may receive further evidence or recommit the matter to the
commissioner with instructions.
C. The commissioner shall have the same powers as a judge to punish for
contempt of court, as set forth in Code of Civil Procedure Articles 221 through 227.
A. The commissioner has all powers of a district judge not inconsistent with
the United States Constitution, the Constitution of Louisiana, and applicable federal
and state laws.
B. The commissioner has jurisdiction over criminal, civil, domestic relations,
and family law matters.
C. The provisions of this Section do not affect or limit the jurisdiction of a
district judge as provided by law.
D. Subject to the provisions of Subsections E through G of this Section, the
commissioner shall perform such duties as are assigned by the Fifteenth Judicial
District Court in accordance with the rules prescribed by the elected judges of the
court.
E.(1) The powers of the commissioner when hearing criminal matters may
include but are not limited to the following:
(a) Administering oaths and affirmations.
(b) Taking acknowledgments, affidavits, and depositions.
(c) Qualifying jurors for grand jury and petit jury duty.
(d) Acting on misdemeanor and felony charges through arraignment;
however, the commissioner shall not accept pleas of nolo contendere.
(e) Presiding over traffic arraignments and accepting pleas of guilty or nolo
contendere for traffic offenses issued pursuant to Title 32 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950 by issuing recommendations for review and approval by the district
court with a corresponding waiver to a right to trial before a district judge made on
the record by the defendant.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 164 ENROLLED
(f) Signing and issuing search and arrest warrants upon probable cause being
shown.
(g) Reviewing probable cause affidavits within forty-eight hours of
warrantless arrests.
(h) Fixing bail including but not limited to conducting hearings for the
purpose of fixing bail and issuing protective orders, if a condition of bail, or if
required by statute.
(i) Conducting seventy-two hour hearings as provided in Code of Criminal
Procedure Article 230.1.
(j) Signing waivers of extradition only upon the written consent of the
defendant and the expressed waiver of the defendant's right to have his extradition
heard by a district court.
(k) Supervising all conditions of bail.
(l) Supervising special conditions related to domestic violence, protective
orders, and any other probation conditions.
(m) Reviewing and acting on petitions for temporary protective orders and
matters of domestic violence, including the issuance of temporary orders of
protection and temporary restraining orders, until such time as hearings may be
conducted on the matters.
(n) Conducting hearings regarding protective orders and making
recommendations to the appropriate district judge for the issuance of a preliminary
or permanent injunction.
(2) The commissioner has the same powers as a district judge to fine and
punish for contempt of court as set forth in Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 20
through 25.
F.(1) The powers of the commissioner when hearing civil matters may
include but are not limited to the following:
(a) Administering oaths and affirmations and performing marriage
ceremonies.
(b) Taking acknowledgments, affidavits, and depositions.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 164 ENROLLED
(c) Qualifying jurors for petit jury duty.
(d) Reviewing and acting on petitions for temporary protective orders and
matters of domestic violence, including the issuance of temporary orders of
protection and temporary restraining orders, until such time as hearings may be
conducted on the matters.
(e) Conducting hearings regarding protective orders and making
recommendations to the appropriate judge for the issuance of a preliminary or
permanent injunction.
(2) The commissioner has the same powers as a district judge to fine and
punish for contempt of court as set forth in Code of Civil Procedure Articles 221
through 227.
G.(1)(a) The powers of the commissioner when hearing domestic relations
and family law matters include but are not limited to the following:
(i) Administering oaths and affirmations.
(ii) Taking acknowledgments, affidavits, and depositions.
(iii) Conducting hearings, including evidentiary hearings and trials in matters
for which the commissioner has been designated and assigned to hear.
(b) The commissioner has the same powers as a district judge to punish for
contempt of court as set forth in Code of Civil Procedure Articles 221 through 227.
(2) Civil, domestic relations, and family law matter trials and hearings by the
commissioner shall be governed by the following rules:
(a) The commissioner may conduct any and all proceedings on any matter
pending before the court and order the entry of judgment in any case where the
parties consent in writing to the matter being heard and adjudicated by the
commissioner. Each judgment entered shall be signed by a judge of the district. The
clerk of court, at the time the action is filed, shall notify the parties of their right to
consent to the exercise of such jurisdiction. The decision of the parties shall be
communicated to the clerk. When the parties' consent is required as provided in this
Subsection, the failure of the clerk to file the written waiver in the record shall not
affect the validity or enforcement of a commissioner's findings or judgment. An
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 164 ENROLLED
aggrieved party may appeal a judgment of the commissioner rendered pursuant to
this Subsection in the same manner as an appeal from any other judgment of a
district court.
(b) If any party does not consent to the matter being heard and adjudicated
by the commissioner, the commissioner may be designated to conduct the trial or
hearing and submit to the judge of the appropriate division proposed findings of fact
and recommendations for the disposition of any matter or motion pending before the
court or any application for post-trial relief. In such cases, the commissioner shall
file his proposed findings and recommendations with the court, and shall mail a
copy, postage prepaid, to all parties or their counsel of record. Within ten days after
transmittal of such copy, any party may traverse the findings or recommendations
in writing in a manner specified by the rules of the district court. The judge of the
appropriate division shall make a de novo determination of any findings or
recommendations to which objection is made. The judge may accept, reject, or
modify in whole or in part the findings or recommendations made by the
commissioner and may also receive further evidence or recommit the matter to the
commissioner with instructions.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.